Utah statutes.
77-7-18.   Citation on misdemeanor or infraction charge.
A peace officer, in lieu of taking a person into custody, any public official
of any county or municipality charged with the enforcement of the law, a port-
of-entry agent as defined in Section 72-1-102, an animal control officer of a
special service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District
Act, that is authorized to provide animal control service, and a volunteer
authorized to issue a citation under Section 41-6a-213 may issue and deliver a
citation requiring any person subject to arrest or prosecution on a
misdemeanor or infraction charge to appear at the court of the magistrate
before whom the person should be taken pursuant to law if the person had been
arrested.
